Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 14 Payment of Traffic Fines

12-14-1.
Payment of fines for ordinance violations to clerk of district court.

The town council of any town or the legislative body of any city, except the cities of Providence, Newport, Central Falls, Cranston, and Warwick and the towns of Bristol, Charlestown, Johnston, Narragansett, North Kingstown, South Kingstown, Warren, Westerly, and North Providence may by ordinance provide that whenever a person shall be charged with a violation of a provision of any of its ordinances relating to traffic, the jurisdiction and cognizances of violations of which ordinance is in the district court, and the person is notified in writing by a police officer to appear on a day and hour stated in the notice to answer the charge before a division of the district court having jurisdiction, the person, instead of personally appearing in court, may, in person or by one duly authorized by him or her in writing, appear before the clerk of the division of the district court having jurisdiction, admit the truth of the charge and pay to the clerk any fine that the court may from time to time, by standing order or rule establish or as may be fixed by the ordinance enacted under this section as the fixed penalty for those violations, not to exceed in any case the maximum fine imposed by law; provided, that appearance, admission, and payment is made at the office of the clerk during the office hours of the clerk within seven (7) days of the notification, and failure to appear within that time shall be deemed a waiver of the right to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court. The payment of the fine to the clerk in the manner provided in this section shall operate as a final disposition of the charge and the proceedings shall not be deemed criminal. The notice shall indicate the offense charged and shall also contain any information that will enable the person charged to take advantage of the provisions of the ordinance enacted under this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 42; P.L. 1932, ch. 1924, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2618, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 42; P.L. 1940, ch. 863, § 1; P.L. 1941, ch. 1008, § 1; P.L. 1942, ch. 1120, § 1; P.L. 1945, ch. 1546, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1912, § 1; P.L. 1948 ch. 2137, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2976, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-14-1

; P.L. 1961, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 49, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 136, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 25.

12-14-2.
Violation of parking regulations in the city of Newport.

The city of Newport is authorized and empowered to fix any fines that the Newport city council may, from time to time, establish for violation of traffic ordinances. The city council may designate the police department for the purpose of collecting any fines, when the offender desires to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court within seven (7) days from notification of the fine. The police department is authorized to receive the fines, directly or by mail, from any person charged with violation of any provision of the ordinances of the city relating to traffic, and the money so received and collected shall be turned over by the police to the director of finance of the city. All charges, records and payments shall be immediately entered by the police in their books, containing records of the violations, their disposition, and money received as fines shall be audited not less than once every three (3) months by the finance director of the city. In the event the offender refuses or neglects to dispose of the charges within seven (7) days, then he or she shall be brought before the district court of the state of Rhode Island, second division, for trial and for any disposition of the case that the court may decide to be proper, in which case, the provisions of §

12-14-1

, relating to fines and their disposition, shall prevail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1932, ch. 1907, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 43; P.L. 1951, ch. 2677, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-14-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 25; P.L. 1971, ch. 118, § 1.

12-14-3.
Violations of Central Falls ordinance.

The city of Central Falls is authorized and empowered to fix any fines that the council committee on police may, from time to time, establish for violation of traffic ordinances. The council committee on police may designate one person who shall act as clerk of the police department for the purpose of collecting fines as provided in this section, when the offender decides to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court, within seven (7) days from notification of the fine. The police clerk of the police department is authorized to receive the fines directly from any person charged with a violation of any provision of the ordinances of the city relating to traffic, and the money so received and collected shall be turned over by the police clerk to the city treasurer. All charges, records and payments shall be immediately entered by the clerk of police, and the books of the clerk of police containing records of the violations, their dispositions, and money received as fines shall be audited not less than once each month by the city auditor of the city. In the event the offender refuses or neglects to dispose of the charges before seven (7) days, then he or she shall be brought before the district court for the fifth division for trial and for any disposition of the case that the court may decide to be proper, in which case the provisions of §

12-14-1

relating to fines and their disposition shall prevail.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 43; P.L. 1938, ch. 2618, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 44; G.L. 1956, §

12-14-3

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 25.

12-14-4.
Violations of Bristol, Johnston, Narragansett, North Kingstown, South Kingstown, Warren, Westerly, West Warwick, and North Providence ordinances.

The towns of Bristol, Johnston, Narragansett, North Kingstown, South Kingstown, Warren, Westerly, West Warwick and North Providence are authorized and empowered to fix any fines that the respective town council may, from time to time, establish for violation of traffic ordinances. The town councils may designate the police department for the purpose of collecting the fines as provided in this section, when the offender decides to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court within seven (7) days from the notification. The police department is authorized to receive the fines directly from any person charged with a violation of any provision of the ordinances of the town relating to traffic, and the money so received and collected shall be turned over by the police to the town treasurer. All charges, records and payments shall be immediately entered by the police, and the books of the police containing records of the violations, their dispositions and money received as fines shall be audited not less than once every three (3) months by a town auditor of the town. In the event the offender refuses or neglects to dispose of the charges before seven (7) days, then he or she shall be brought before the district court for the first, fourth, or sixth divisions, as the case may be, for trial and for any disposition of the case that the court may decide to be proper, in which case the provisions of §

12-14-1

, relating to fines and their disposition, shall prevail.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 45; P.L. 1940, ch. 863, § 2; P.L. 1941, ch. 1008, § 2; P.L. 1942, ch. 1120, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-14-4

; P.L. 1961, ch. 16, § 2; P.L. 1961, ch. 49, § 2; P.L. 1962, ch. 136, § 2; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 25; P.L. 2001, ch. 298, § 1.

12-14-5.
Violations of Cranston ordinance.

The city of Cranston is authorized and empowered to fix any fines that the committee on police of the city council may, from time to time, establish as fines for violation of traffic ordinances. The committee on police may designate the police department for the purpose of collecting the fines as provided in this section, when the offender decides to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court within seven (7) days from notification. The police department is authorized to receive the fines directly from any person charged with violation of any provision of the ordinances of the city relating to traffic, and the money so received and collected shall be turned over by the police to the city treasurer. All charges, records, and payments shall be immediately entered by the police and the books of the police containing records of the violations, their dispositions, and money received as fines shall be audited not less than once every three (3) months by the city auditor of the city. In the event the offender refuses or neglects to dispose of the charges within seven (7) days, then he or she shall be brought before the district court for the sixth division for trial and for any disposition of the case that the court may decide to be proper, in which case the provisions of §

12-14-1

, relating to fines and their disposition, shall prevail.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 46; P.L. 1945, ch. 1546, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-14-5

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 25.

12-14-6.
Violations of Warwick ordinances.

The city of Warwick is authorized and empowered to fix any fines that the police commission of the city of Warwick may, from time to time, establish for violation of traffic ordinances. The police department shall collect the fines as provided in this section, when the offender decides to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court within seven (7) days from notification. The police department is authorized to receive fines directly from any person charged with a violation of any provision of the ordinance of the city relating to traffic, and the money so received and collected shall be turned over by the police to the city treasurer. All charges, records, and payments shall be immediately entered by the police, and the books of the police containing the records of the violations, their dispositions, and money received as fines, shall be audited not less than once every three (3) months by the city auditor of the city. In the event the offender refuses or neglects to dispose of the charges within seven (7) days, then he or she shall be brought before the district court for the third division for trial and for any disposition of the case that the court may decide to be proper, in which case the provisions of §

12-14-1

, relating to fines and their disposition, shall prevail.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 47; P.L. 1947, ch. 1912, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-14-6

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 25.

12-14-7.
Violations of Pawtucket ordinances.

The city of Pawtucket is authorized and empowered to fix any fines that the public safety commission of the city of Pawtucket may, from time to time, establish for violation of traffic ordinances. The police department shall collect fines as provided in this section, when the offender decides to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court within seven (7) days from notification. The police department is authorized to receive fines directly from any person charged with a violation of any provision of the ordinance of the city relating to traffic, and the money so received and collected shall be turned over by the police to the city treasurer. All charges, records, and payments shall be immediately entered by the police, and the books of the police containing the records of the violations, their disposition, and money received as fines, shall be audited not less than once every three (3) months by the city auditor of the city. In the event the offender refuses or neglects to dispose of the charges within seven (7) days, then he or she shall be brought before the district court for the fifth division for trial and for any disposition of the case that the court may decide to be proper, in which case the provisions of §

12-14-1

, relating to fines and their disposition, shall prevail.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 48; P.L. 1948, ch. 2137, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-14-7

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 25.

12-14-8.
Violations of Charlestown ordinance.

The town of Charlestown is authorized and empowered to fix any fines that the committee on police of the town council may, from time to time, establish for violation of traffic ordinances. The committee on police may designate the police department for the purpose of collecting fines as provided in this section, when the offender decides to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court within seven (7) days from notification. The police department is authorized to receive the fines directly from any person charged with a violation of any provision of the ordinances of the town relating to traffic, and the money so received and collected shall be turned over by the police to the town treasurer. All charges, records, and payments shall be immediately entered by the police, and the books of the police containing records of the violations, their dispositions, and money received as fines shall be audited not less than once every three (3) months by the town auditor of the town. In the event the offender refuses or neglects to dispose of the charges within seven (7) days, then he or she shall be brought before the district court for the fourth division for trial and for any disposition of the case that the court may decide to be proper, in which case the provisions of §

12-14-1

, relating to fines, and their disposition, shall prevail.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 49; P.L. 1952, ch. 2976, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

12-14-8

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 25.

12-14-9.
Violations of Lincoln ordinances.

A person charged with a violation of any provision of the ordinances relating to traffic, ordained by the town council of the town of Lincoln, except as provided in this section, and notified in writing by a police officer to appear on a day and hour stated in the notice to answer the charge before the district court for the fifth division, instead of personally appearing in court, may in person or by one duly authorized by him or her in writing appear at the Lincoln town clerk’s office admit the truth of the charge and pay to the town clerk one dollar ($1.00) for the first violation, two dollars ($2.00) for the second violation, and three dollars ($3.00) for the third violation committed within the consecutive period of twelve (12) months next preceding the date of the violation; provided, that operators of cars registered out of the state may pay fines by mailing the tag and the amount of the fine, within three (3) days from the violation, if it is a first violation, or within three (3) days of receipt of notice from the officer in charge of traffic violations that the violation is a second or third violation, as the case may be, by certified mail postage prepaid, addressed to the town clerk, town clerk’s office, Lincoln, Rhode Island. Failure to appear and pay the fine or to mail the tag and the amount of the fine within three (3) days of the notice shall be deemed a waiver to dispose of the charge without personal appearance before the district court; provided, that person charged with passing a red light, stop signal, and/or the manual signal to stop of a properly authorized police officer may appear before the town clerk at the town clerk’s office and pay to him or her the sum of five dollars ($5.00) for the first violation and ten dollars ($10.00) for the second violation; and provided, further, that appearance, admission, and payment is made to the town clerk at the town clerk’s office within three (3) days of notification, and failure to appear within that time, shall be deemed a waiver of the right to appear and to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in the district court. The payment of the fine in the manner provided in this section shall operate as a final disposition of the charge, and the proceedings shall not be deemed criminal. The notice provided in this section shall indicate the offense charged and shall also contain any information that will enable the person charged to take advantage of the provisions of this section. The right to dispose of a charge without personal appearance in court may not be exercised by any person who in any consecutive period of twelve (12) months next preceding the charge has been three (3) times in the aggregate adjudged guilty by the court, or has admitted the truth of the charges made against him or her of a violation of the ordinance relating to traffic for illegal parking or twice for the traffic ordinance relating to passing a red light, stop signal, or manual signal of an authorized officer to stop under the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 25.

12-14-10.
Violations of traffic and parking regulations in the town of Jamestown.

A person charged with the violation of any provision of the ordinances relating to parking and/or traffic ordained by the town council of the town of Jamestown, and a person charged with a violation of any parking regulation of the state traffic commission relating to parking in Jamestown, notified in writing by a police officer to appear on a day and hour stated in the notice to answer the charge before the district court of the second division, instead of personally appearing in court may in person or by one duly authorized by him or her in writing appear at the Jamestown police station, admit the truth of the charge and pay to the officer in charge of the police station the amount of the fine set forth in the ordinance or parking regulation of the state traffic commission for violations, and the police department shall collect the fines as provided in this section, when the offender decides to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court within seven (7) days from notification. The police department is authorized to receive fines directly from any person charged with a violation, and money so received and collected shall be turned over by the police to the town treasurer. All charges, records, and payments shall be immediately entered by the police and the books of the police containing the records of the violations, their dispositions and money received as fines, shall be audited not less than once every three (3) months by the town treasurer of the town. In the event the offender refuses or neglects to dispose of the charges within seven (7) days, then he or she shall be brought before the district court of the second division for trial and for any disposition of the case that the court may decide to be proper, in which case the provisions of §

12-14-1

, relating to fines and their disposition, shall prevail. In addition the offender may mail the fine in accordance with the applicable provisions of the general laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 25; P.L. 1972, ch. 232, § 1.

12-14-11.
Violations of parking regulations in the town of Barrington.

The town of Barrington is authorized and empowered to fix any fines that the Barrington town council may, from time to time, establish for violation of any provision of the ordinances relating to parking. The town council may designate the police department for the purpose of collecting fines as provided in this section, when the offender desires to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court, within seven (7) days from notification. The police department is authorized to receive the fines, directly or by mail, from any person charged with violation of any provision of the ordinances of the town relating to traffic, and the money so received and collected shall be turned over by the police to the town treasurer of Barrington. All charges, records, and payments shall be immediately entered by the police in their books containing records of violations, and their disposition, and money received as fines shall be audited not less than once every three (3) months by the town treasurer of the town. In the event the offender refuses or neglects to dispose of the charges within seven (7) days, then he or she shall be brought before the district court of the state of Rhode Island, first division, for trial and for any disposition of the case that the court may decide to be proper, in which case the provisions of §

12-14-1

, relating to fines and their disposition, shall prevail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 134, § 2.

12-14-12.
Violations of parking regulations in the town of Smithfield.

The town of Smithfield is authorized and empowered to fix any fines that the Smithfield town council may, from time to time, establish for violation of any provision of the ordinances relating to parking. The town council may designate the police department for the purpose of collecting fines as provided in this section, when the offender desires to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court, within seven (7) days from notification. The police department is authorized to receive fines, directly or by mail, from any person charged with violation of any provision of the ordinances of the town relating to traffic, and the money so received and collected shall be turned over by the police to the town treasurer of Smithfield. All charges, records, and payments shall be immediately entered by the police in the books of the police containing records of violations and their disposition, and money received as fines shall be audited not less than once every three (3) months by the town treasurer of the town. In the event the offender refuses or neglects to dispose of the charges within seven (7) days, then he or she shall be brought before the district court of the state of Rhode Island, seventh division, for trial and for any disposition of the case that the court may decide to be proper, in which case the provisions of §

12-14-1

, relating to fines and their disposition, shall prevail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 158, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 25; P.L. 1985, ch. 172, §§ 1, 2.

12-14-13.
Violations of parking regulations in the town of Burrillville.

The town of Burrillville is further authorized and empowered to fix any fines that the town council may, from time to time, establish for violation of its traffic ordinances. The town council may designate the police department for the purpose of collecting fines as provided in this section, when the offender decides to dispose of a charge without personal appearance in court within three (3) days from the date of notification.

A person charged with the violation of any provision of the ordinances relating to parking ordained by the town council of the town of Burrillville and notified in writing by a police officer to appear on a day and hour stated in the notice to answer the charge before the district court for the seventh division instead of personally appearing in court may, in person or by one duly authorized by him or her in writing, appear at the Burrillville police station, admit the truth of the charge and pay the fine to the officer in charge of the police station; provided, that operators of cars registered out of the state may pay the fine by mailing the tag and the amount of the fine within three (3) days from the date of the violation, postage prepaid, addressed to the town clerk, town clerk’s office, Burrillville, Rhode Island; failure to appear and pay the fine or to mail the tag and the amount of the fine within three (3) days of the notice shall be deemed a waiver to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court; and provided, further, that the appearance, admission, and payment is made to the clerk within three (3) days of notification, and failure to appear within that time shall be deemed a waiver of the right to appear and to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court. The payment of the fine in the manner provided in this section shall operate as a final disposition of the charge and the proceedings shall not be deemed criminal. The notice provided pursuant to this section shall indicate the offense charged and shall also contain any information that will enable the person charged to take advantage of the provisions of this section. The right to dispose of a charge without personal appearance in court may not be exercised by any person who in any consecutive period of twelve (12) months next preceding the charge has been three (3) times in the aggregate adjudged guilty by the court, or has three (3) times admitted the truth of the charges made against him or her under the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 159, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 25; P.L. 1985, ch. 320, § 1.

12-14-14.
Violations of parking regulations in the town of Portsmouth.

The town of Portsmouth is authorized and empowered to fix any fines that the Portsmouth town council may, from time to time, establish for violation of any provision of the ordinances relating to parking. The town council may designate the police department for the purpose of collecting the fines as provided in this section, when the offender desires to dispose of the charge without personal appearance in court, within seven (7) days from notification. The police department is authorized to receive the fines, directly or by mail, from any person charged with violation of any provision of the ordinances of the town relating to traffic, and the money so received and collected shall be turned over by the police to the town treasurer of Portsmouth. All charges, records, and payments shall be immediately entered by the police in their books containing records of violations and their disposition, and money received as fines shall be audited not less than once every three (3) months by the town finance director’s office of the town. In the event the offender refuses or neglects to dispose of the charges within seven (7) days, then he or she shall be brought before the district court of the state of Rhode Island, second division, for trial and for any disposition of the case that the court may decide to be proper, in which case the provisions of §

12-14-1

, relating to fines and their disposition, shall prevail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 266, § 1.